Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1
F

RANKLIN D. ROOSEVELT WARM SPRINGS POOLS AND SPRINGS SITE COMMISSION

12-3-130 through 12-3-133.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 2001, p. 873, § 1, effective July 1, 2001.

Editor's notes.

- This part was based on Ga. L. 1979, p. 997,

§§

1-4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302,

§

15; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4,

§

12.